Hawaii statutes.
§414D-305
Limitations on use of membership list. Without consent of the board, a
membership list or any part thereof shall not be obtained or used by any person
for any purpose unrelated to a member's interest as a member. Without limiting
the generality of the foregoing, without the consent of the board, a membership
list or any part thereof shall not be:

(1) Used to solicit money or property unless the
money or property will be used solely to solicit the votes of the members in an
election to be held by the corporation;

(2) Used for any commercial purpose;

(3) Sold to or purchased by any person; or

(4) Published in whole or in part to the general
public. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130,
§69]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next